Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-3801
Terms, defined.

As used in sections 29-3801 to 29-3809, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Director shall mean the Director of Correctional Services; and

(2) Prosecutor shall mean a prosecuting attorney as defined in section 29-104.

Laws 1984, LB 591, § 1.

The procedure set out in this section, including the speedy trial provision of section 29-3805, applies only to a prisoner in the custody of the Department of Correctional Services and ceases to apply to a criminal defendant when he or she is discharged from the custody of the Department of Correctional Services. State v. Yzeta, 313 Neb. 202, 983 N.W.2d 124 (2023).

The procedure set out in section 29-3801 et seq., rather than that in section 29-1201 et seq., applies to instate prisoners. State v. Ebert, 235 Neb. 330, 455 N.W.2d 165 (1990).